Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.266

Unlawful sale of telecommunication device.

(1) A person is guilty of unlawful sale of a telecommunication device if he or she sells, leases, exchanges, or offers to sell, lease, or exchange:

(a) A telecommunication device, knowing that the purchaser, lessee, or recipient, or a third person, intends to use the device to avoid payment or to facilitate avoidance of payment for telecommunication services; or

(b) Any material, including data, computer software, or other information and equipment, knowing that the purchaser, lessee, or recipient, or a third person, intends to use the material to avoid payment or to facilitate avoidance of payment for telecommunication services.

(2) Unlawful sale of a telecommunication device is a class C felony.

[ 1995 c 92 s 8.]

NOTES:

Telecommunications crime: Chapter 9.26A RCW.